language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/hsb-upper-sorbian/upper_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_kuskec_magerowa_catalog_bvs_soblex_package_stiftung_wiki_retry__hsb_DE_soblex_w8_3.09.18.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0490 Y 54
SFX 0490 ńć ńdu ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdź ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźe ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźech ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźechmoj ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźechmy ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźechu ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźemoj ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźemy ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźena ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźenaj ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźene ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźeneho ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźenej ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźeneje ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźeneju ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźenemu ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźeni ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźenja ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźenjach ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźenjam ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźenje ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźenjemi ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźenjom ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźenjomaj ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźenjow ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźenju ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźenoh ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźenom ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźenu ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźeny ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźenych ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźenym ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźenymaj ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźenymi ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźetaj ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźetej ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźeće ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźeš ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźeštaj ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźeštej ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźešće ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźmoj ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźmy ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźtaj ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźtej ..
SFX 0490 ńć ńdźće ..
SFX 0490 ńć šedši ..
SFX 0490 ńć šli ..
SFX 0490 ńć šoł ..
SFX 0490 ńć šła ..
SFX 0490 ńć šłe ..
SFX 0490 ńć šło ..
SFX 0490 ńć šłoj ..

SFX 0491 Y 15
SFX 0491 a aj .
SFX 0491 a e .
SFX 0491 a eho .
SFX 0491 a ej .
SFX 0491 a eje .
SFX 0491 a eju .
SFX 0491 a emu .
SFX 0491 a oh .
SFX 0491 a om .
SFX 0491 a u .
SFX 0491 a y .
SFX 0491 a ych .
SFX 0491 a ym .
SFX 0491 a ymaj .
SFX 0491 a ymi .

SFX 0492 Y 16
SFX 0492 ata ataj ...
SFX 0492 ata ate ...
SFX 0492 ata ateho ...
SFX 0492 ata atej ...
SFX 0492 ata ateje ...
SFX 0492 ata ateju ...
SFX 0492 ata atemu ...
SFX 0492 ata atoh ...
SFX 0492 ata atom ...
SFX 0492 ata atu ...
SFX 0492 ata aty ...
SFX 0492 ata atych ...
SFX 0492 ata atym ...
SFX 0492 ata atymaj ...
SFX 0492 ata atymi ...
SFX 0492 ata eći ...

SFX 0493 Y 17
SFX 0493 ata ataj ...
SFX 0493 ata ate ...
SFX 0493 ata ateho ...
SFX 0493 ata atej ...
SFX 0493 ata ateje ...
SFX 0493 ata ateju ...
SFX 0493 ata atemu ...
SFX 0493 ata atoh ...
SFX 0493 ata atom ...
SFX 0493 ata atu ...
SFX 0493 ata aty ...
SFX 0493 ata atych ...
SFX 0493 ata atym ...
SFX 0493 ata atymaj ...
SFX 0493 ata atymi ...
SFX 0493 ata eće ...
SFX 0493 ata eći ...

SFX 0494 Y 34
SFX 0494 ata ataj ...
SFX 0494 ata ate ...
SFX 0494 ata ateho ...
SFX 0494 ata atej ...
SFX 0494 ata ateje ...
SFX 0494 ata ateju ...
SFX 0494 ata atemu ...
SFX 0494 ata ato ...
SFX 0494 ata atoh ...
SFX 0494 ata atom ...
SFX 0494 ata atu ...
SFX 0494 ata aty ...
SFX 0494 ata atych ...
SFX 0494 ata atym ...
SFX 0494 ata atymaj ...
SFX 0494 ata atymi ...
SFX 0494 ata eće ...
SFX 0494 ata eći ...
SFX 0494 ata ećiša ...
SFX 0494 ata ećiše ...
SFX 0494 ata ećišeho ...
SFX 0494 ata ećišej ...
SFX 0494 ata ećišeje ...
SFX 0494 ata ećišeju ...
SFX 0494 ata ećišemu ...
SFX 0494 ata ećiši ...
SFX 0494 ata ećišich ...
SFX 0494 ata ećišim ...
SFX 0494 ata ećišimaj ...
SFX 0494 ata ećišimi ...
SFX 0494 ata ećišo ...
SFX 0494 ata ećišoh ...
SFX 0494 ata ećišom ...
SFX 0494 ata ećišu ...

SFX 0495 Y 55
SFX 0495 ła ćel ..
SFX 0495 ła ćele ..
SFX 0495 ła ćelemoj ..
SFX 0495 ła ćelemy ..
SFX 0495 ła ćeletaj ..
SFX 0495 ła ćeletej ..
SFX 0495 ła ćeleće ..
SFX 0495 ła ćeleš ..
SFX 0495 ła ćelmoj ..
SFX 0495 ła ćelmy ..
SFX 0495 ła ćeltaj ..
SFX 0495 ła ćeltej ..
SFX 0495 ła ćelu ..
SFX 0495 ła ćelće ..
SFX 0495 ła łach ..
SFX 0495 ła łachmoj ..
SFX 0495 ła łachmy ..
SFX 0495 ła łachu ..
SFX 0495 ła łali ..
SFX 0495 ła łana ..
SFX 0495 ła łanaj ..
SFX 0495 ła łane ..
SFX 0495 ła łaneho ..
SFX 0495 ła łanej ..
SFX 0495 ła łaneje ..
SFX 0495 ła łaneju ..
SFX 0495 ła łanemu ..
SFX 0495 ła łani ..
SFX 0495 ła łanja ..
SFX 0495 ła łanjach ..
SFX 0495 ła łanjam ..
SFX 0495 ła łanje ..
SFX 0495 ła łanjemi ..
SFX 0495 ła łanjom ..
SFX 0495 ła łanjomaj ..
SFX 0495 ła łanjow ..
SFX 0495 ła łanju ..
SFX 0495 ła łanoh ..
SFX 0495 ła łanom ..
SFX 0495 ła łanu ..
SFX 0495 ła łany ..
SFX 0495 ła łanych ..
SFX 0495 ła łanym ..
SFX 0495 ła łanymaj ..
SFX 0495 ła łanymi ..
SFX 0495 ła ławši ..
SFX 0495 ła łać ..
SFX 0495 ła łał ..
SFX 0495 ła łała ..
SFX 0495 ła łałe ..
SFX 0495 ła łało ..
SFX 0495 ła łałoj ..
SFX 0495 ła łaštaj ..
SFX 0495 ła łaštej ..
SFX 0495 ła łašće ..

SFX 0496 Y 56
SFX 0496 0 i .
SFX 0496 0 imoj .
SFX 0496 0 imy .
SFX 0496 0 itaj .
SFX 0496 0 itej .
SFX 0496 0 iće .
SFX 0496 0 iš .
SFX 0496 0 ja .
SFX 0496 0 je .
SFX 0496 0 jech .
SFX 0496 0 jechmoj .
SFX 0496 0 jechmy .
SFX 0496 0 jechu .
SFX 0496 0 jeli .
SFX 0496 0 jena .
SFX 0496 0 jenaj .
SFX 0496 0 jene .
SFX 0496 0 jeneho .
SFX 0496 0 jenej .
SFX 0496 0 jeneje .
SFX 0496 0 jeneju .
SFX 0496 0 jenemu .
SFX 0496 0 jeni .
SFX 0496 0 jenja .
SFX 0496 0 jenjach .
SFX 0496 0 jenjam .
SFX 0496 0 jenje .
SFX 0496 0 jenjemi .
SFX 0496 0 jenjom .
SFX 0496 0 jenjomaj .
SFX 0496 0 jenjow .
SFX 0496 0 jenju .
SFX 0496 0 jenoh .
SFX 0496 0 jenom .
SFX 0496 0 jenu .
SFX 0496 0 jeny .
SFX 0496 0 jenych .
SFX 0496 0 jenym .
SFX 0496 0 jenymaj .
SFX 0496 0 jenymi .
SFX 0496 0 jewši .
SFX 0496 0 jeć .
SFX 0496 0 jeł .
SFX 0496 0 jeła .
SFX 0496 0 jełe .
SFX 0496 0 jeło .
SFX 0496 0 jełoj .
SFX 0496 0 ještaj .
SFX 0496 0 ještej .
SFX 0496 0 ješće .
SFX 0496 0 ju .
SFX 0496 0 moj .
SFX 0496 0 my .
SFX 0496 0 taj .
SFX 0496 0 tej .
SFX 0496 0 će .

SFX 0497 Y 15
SFX 0497 0 a .
SFX 0497 0 e .
SFX 0497 0 eho .
SFX 0497 0 ej .
SFX 0497 0 eje .
SFX 0497 0 eju .
SFX 0497 0 emu .
SFX 0497 0 i .
SFX 0497 0 ich .
SFX 0497 0 im .
SFX 0497 0 imaj .
SFX 0497 0 imi .
SFX 0497 0 oh .
SFX 0497 0 om .
SFX 0497 0 u .

SFX 0498 Y 74
SFX 0498 li ni ..
SFX 0498 li nimoj ..
SFX 0498 li nimy ..
SFX 0498 li nitaj ..
SFX 0498 li nitej ..
SFX 0498 li niće ..
SFX 0498 li nje ..
SFX 0498 li njemoj ..
SFX 0498 li njemy ..
SFX 0498 li njena ..
SFX 0498 li njenaj ..
SFX 0498 li njene ..
SFX 0498 li njeneho ..
SFX 0498 li njenej ..
SFX 0498 li njeneje ..
SFX 0498 li njeneju ..
SFX 0498 li njenemu ..
SFX 0498 li njeni ..
SFX 0498 li njenja ..
SFX 0498 li njenjach ..
SFX 0498 li njenjam ..
SFX 0498 li njenje ..
SFX 0498 li njenjemi ..
SFX 0498 li njenjom ..
SFX 0498 li njenjomaj ..
SFX 0498 li njenjow ..
SFX 0498 li njenju ..
SFX 0498 li njenoh ..
SFX 0498 li njenom ..
SFX 0498 li njenu ..
SFX 0498 li njeny ..
SFX 0498 li njenych ..
SFX 0498 li njenym ..
SFX 0498 li njenymaj ..
SFX 0498 li njenymi ..
SFX 0498 li njetaj ..
SFX 0498 li njetej ..
SFX 0498 li njeće ..
SFX 0498 li nješ ..
SFX 0498 li nu ..
SFX 0498 li ny ..
SFX 0498 li nych ..
SFX 0498 li nychmoj ..
SFX 0498 li nychmy ..
SFX 0498 li nychu ..
SFX 0498 li nyli ..
SFX 0498 li nywši ..
SFX 0498 li nyć ..
SFX 0498 li nył ..
SFX 0498 li nyła ..
SFX 0498 li nyłe ..
SFX 0498 li nyło ..
SFX 0498 li nyłoj ..
SFX 0498 li nyštaj ..
SFX 0498 li nyštej ..
SFX 0498 li nyšće ..
SFX 0498 li ła ..
SFX 0498 li łaj ..
SFX 0498 li łe ..
SFX 0498 li łeho ..
SFX 0498 li łej ..
SFX 0498 li łeje ..
SFX 0498 li łeju ..
SFX 0498 li łemu ..
SFX 0498 li ło ..
SFX 0498 li łoh ..
SFX 0498 li łoj ..
SFX 0498 li łom ..
SFX 0498 li łu ..
SFX 0498 li ły ..
SFX 0498 li łych ..
SFX 0498 li łym ..
SFX 0498 li łymaj ..
SFX 0498 li łymi ..

SFX 0499 Y 7
SFX 0499 su jes ..
SFX 0499 su sach ..
SFX 0499 su sam ..
SFX 0499 su sami ..
SFX 0499 su somaj ..
SFX 0499 su sow ..
SFX 0499 su sy ..

SFX 0500 Y 4
SFX 0500 i ach .
SFX 0500 i am .
SFX 0500 i emi .
SFX 0500 i ow .

SFX 0501 Y 17
SFX 0501 k čna .
SFX 0501 k čnaj .
SFX 0501 k čne .
SFX 0501 k čneho .
SFX 0501 k čnej .
SFX 0501 k čneje .
SFX 0501 k čneju .
SFX 0501 k čnemu .
SFX 0501 k čni .
SFX 0501 k čnoh .
SFX 0501 k čnom .
SFX 0501 k čnu .
SFX 0501 k čny .
SFX 0501 k čnych .
SFX 0501 k čnym .
SFX 0501 k čnymaj .
SFX 0501 k čnymi .
