language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/hsb-upper-sorbian/upper_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_kuskec_magerowa_catalog_bvs_soblex_package_stiftung_wiki_retry__hsb_DE_soblex_w8_3.09.18.dic
3D-nawoči/0500
SOS-wsu/0499
VR-nawoči/0500
Wsu/0499
doćerp/0496
napjata/0494
naswar/0496
nasła/0495
nawjadli/0498
nawoči/0500
nawsu/0499
nańć/0490
naš/0497
njedoćerp/0496
njenaswar/0496
njenasła/0495
njenawjadli/0498
njenańć/0490
njeposwar/0496
njeposła/0495
njepoćerp/0496
njepósła/0495
njepřećerp/0496
njepřeńć/0490
njepřipósła/0495
njepřińć/0490
njerozesła/0495
njerozpósła/0495
njeschor/0496
njespósła/0495
njestwjerdli/0498
njesćerp/0496
njewoblědli/0498
njewotchor/0496
njewotesła/0495
njewotpósła/0495
njewupósła/0495
njewustudli/0498
njewuswar/0496
njewusła/0495
njewućerp/0496
njezapósła/0495
njezaswar/0496
njezaswjerb/0496
njezasła/0495
njezańć/0490
njezblědli/0498
njezeńć/0490
njezwjadli/0498
poswar/0496
posła/0495
poćerp/0496
prawsu/0499
pósła/0495
přenapinaca/0491
přenapjata/0492
přenapjata/0493
přenawopak/0501
přeswjata/0493
přewopak/0501
přećerp/0496
přeńć/0490
připósła/0495
rozesła/0495
rozpósła/0495
schor/0496
spósła/0495
stwjerdli/0498
swjata/0494
sćerp/0496
waš/0497
woblědli/0498
wobwoči/0500
wotchor/0496
wotesła/0495
wotpósła/0495
wsu/0499
wupósła/0495
wustudli/0498
wuswar/0496
wusła/0495
wućerp/0496
zapósła/0495
zaswar/0496
zaswjerb/0496
zasła/0495
zańć/0490
zblědli/0498
zeńć/0490
zwjadli/0498
